Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-647
Indebtedness; default; possession by creditors; agreement authorized; terms; property restored to district; when.

In order to protect and safeguard the security and the rights of the purchasers or holders of revenue debentures, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness, issued by any district organized under or subject to Chapter 70, article 6, each such district may agree with such purchasers or holders that in the event of default in the payment of interest on, or principal of, any such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness, or in the event of default in performance of any duty or obligation of such district in connection therewith, such purchasers or holders, or trustee selected by them, may take possession and control of the business and the property of the district, and proceed to operate the same, and to collect and receive the income thereof, and after paying all necessary and proper operating expenses and all other proper disbursements or liabilities made or incurred, use the surplus, if any there be, of the revenue of the district as follows: (1) In the payment of all outstanding past-due interest on each issue of revenue debentures, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness, so far as such net revenue will go, and paying pro rata the interest due on each issue thereof when there is not enough to pay in full all of the interest; and (2) if any sums shall remain after the payment of interest as aforesaid, then in the payment of the revenue debentures, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness, which, by the terms thereof, shall be due and payable on each outstanding issue in accordance with the terms thereof, and paying pro rata when the money available is not sufficient to pay in full. When all legal taxes and charges, and all arrears of interest, and all matured revenue debentures, notes, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness, have been paid in full, the control of the business and the possession of the property of the district shall then be restored to such district. The privilege herein granted shall be a continuing one as often as the occasion therefor may arise.

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 7, p. 587;

Laws 1939, c. 88, § 1, p. 382;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-712;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 6, p. 526;

R.S.1943, § 70-647;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 24.